Washington statutes.
RCW 18.240.020

Certification required.

No person may practice as a certified animal massage therapist in this state without having a certification issued by the secretary unless he or she is exempt under RCW 18.240.040.

[ 2016 c 41 s 21; 2007 c 70 s 3.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2016 c 41: See note following RCW 18.108.010.